District of Columbia statutes.
10-160

Theodore Roosevelt Island — Structures authorized; appropriations.

That the Secretary of the Interior shall erect on Theodore Roosevelt Island such monument or memorial to the memory of Theodore Roosevelt, and related structures, as may be approved by the living children of Theodore Roosevelt, the Theodore Roosevelt Association, the Commission on the Arts and Humanities, and the National Capital Planning Commission. There are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History

May 21, 1932, 47 Stat. 164, ch. 200, § 3
Feb. 11, 1933, 47 Stat. 799, ch. 48, § 1
May 21, 1953, 67 Stat. 27, ch. 63, § 2
Sept. 13, 1960, 74 Stat. 904, Pub. L. 86-764

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-160.
1973 Ed., § 8-166.